Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1679.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1901(b) of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1901. Removal of electors.* * *(b) Voter removal program.--* * *(3.1) In addition to and not as an alternative to a program established under paragraph (1), a commission shall establish a process for the owner or lessee of an individual residence to report the registration of any individual listed at that address who does not currently reside in the home. A commission shall send a notice under subsection (d) immediately to any registered voter reported under the 123456789101112131415161718 program and shall additionally attempt to contact the registered voter at any alternative address available in order to update the registration.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1679PN2055 - 2 - 12345